New York, session 2025-2026, A5006.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of section 2 218 of the elder law, as added by chapter 259 of the laws of 2018, is 3 amended, and a new paragraph (i) is added to read as follows: 4 (1) is an employee or volunteer of the state office for the aging or 5 of a designated local [ombudsman] ombudsperson entity, or a member of a 6 district long-term care ombudsperson council program and represents the 7 state long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson program; 8 (i) "District council" or "district council program" shall mean the 9 district long-term care ombudsperson council program established in 10 subdivision four of this section. 11 § 2. The opening paragraph and subparagraph 7 of paragraph (d) of 12 subdivision 3 of section 218 of the elder law, the opening paragraph as 13 amended by chapter 259 of the laws of 2018 and subparagraph 7 as amended 14 by chapter 770 of the laws of 2023, are amended to read as follows: 15 The state [ombudsman] ombudsperson, personally or through [authorized 16 representatives] the district long-term care ombudsperson council 17 program established in subdivision four of this section, shall: 18 (7) develop a certification training program and continuing education 19 for [ombudsmen] ombudsperson which at a minimum shall specify the mini- 20 mum hours of training, the annual number of hours of in-service train- 21 ing, and the content of the training, including, but not limited to, 22 training relating to cultural competency and diversity, federal, state, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08874-02-6 A. 5006--A 2 1 and local laws, regulations, and policies with respect to long-term care 2 facilities in the state, investigative and resolution techniques, and 3 such other training-related matters as the state [ombudsman] ombudsper- 4 son determines to be appropriate, for the purposes of training members 5 of the district long-term care ombudsperson council program described in 6 subdivision four of this section, such training shall also include an 7 overview of such program; 8 § 3. Subdivision 4 of section 218 of the elder law, as amended by 9 chapter 259 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 10 4. Local long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson program and district 11 long-term ombudsperson council program. (a) The state [ombudsman] 12 ombudsperson, in accordance with applicable state contracting proce- 13 dures, [may] shall designate an entity to operate a local long-term care 14 [ombudsman] ombudsperson program for [one or more counties] each assem- 15 bly district, and shall monitor the performance of each such entity. If 16 the state office for the aging is aware or becomes aware of any evidence 17 that the designation of an entity to operate a long-term care [ombuds- 18 man] ombudsperson program by the state long-term care [ombudsman] ombud- 19 sperson would result in legal concerns or liability for the state office 20 for the aging or office of the state long-term care [ombudsman] ombud- 21 sperson, the state [ombudsman] ombudsperson will comply with the state 22 office for the aging's determination that such designation should not be 23 made. 24 (b) The designated entity shall be an area agency on aging, a public 25 agency or a private not-for-profit corporation which is free from any 26 conflict of interest that cannot be remedied. Any actual and potential 27 conflicts of interest shall be identified and addressed in accordance 28 with subdivision ten of this section. 29 (b-1) The state ombudsperson shall create, in each assembly district, 30 a district long-term care ombudsperson council program to coordinate the 31 volunteers of each local long-term care ombudsperson program within 32 their district. Each district council shall consist of the following 33 members: 34 (i) a trained district coordinator, appointed by the state ombudsper- 35 son, to serve as chair, who shall be paid an annual salary of forty-five 36 thousand dollars; 37 (ii) a trained district coordinator to serve as co-chair, appointed by 38 the state ombudsperson, who shall be paid an annual salary of twenty 39 thousand dollars; 40 (iii) a trained district coordinator, appointed by the state ombud- 41 sperson, to serve as secretary, who shall be paid an annual salary of 42 twenty thousand dollars; and 43 (iv) eight or more residents of such district, approved by the chair, 44 co-chair, and secretary of the district council, to serve as trained 45 district advocates, each of whom shall be paid an annual stipend of one 46 hundred fifty dollars. 47 (b-2) The positions of long-term care ombudsperson program volunteer 48 and district long-term care ombudsperson council program advocate shall 49 be listed with the human resources departments of the department of 50 health, state office for the aging, and any other relevant agency. Such 51 listing shall be included on each such agency's website and marketing 52 materials, and such listing shall be displayed on the department of 53 labor website and in state run care facilities. 54 (b-3) Information about the role and responsibility of the district 55 council program and the contact information of the members of such 56 district council program providing services to a long-term care facility A. 5006--A 3 1 shall be included in the welcome packet of all new residents to such 2 facility alongside the patient bill of rights. 3 (c)(1) Each local long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson program 4 shall be directed by a qualified individual who is employed and paid by 5 the local entity and who shall have the duties and responsibilities as 6 provided in regulations, consistent with the provisions of this section 7 and of Title VII of the federal older Americans act of 1965, as amended. 8 Such director shall work with the district council to carry out the 9 requirements of this section. In addition, upon designation, the entity 10 is responsible for providing for adequate and qualified staff, which may 11 include trained volunteers to perform the functions of the local long- 12 term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson program. 13 (2) No local program staff or district council staff, including the 14 supervisor and any volunteers, shall perform or carry out the activities 15 on behalf of the state long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson program 16 or the district ombudsperson long-term council program unless such staff 17 has been verified as completing the training program developed by the 18 state [ombudsman] ombudsperson and has been approved by the state 19 [ombudsman] ombudsperson as qualified to carry out the activities on 20 behalf of the local program or district council program. 21 (3) For purposes of the district council such trainings shall be given 22 annually for all new recruits to such program and shall be available in 23 both in-person and online formats. Each council member shall also be 24 required to complete two or more professional development trainings 25 annually. Such professional development trainings shall be developed by 26 the state ombudsperson. 27 (d) When the state [ombudsman] ombudsperson determines that a local 28 long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson program does not meet the stand- 29 ards set forth in this section and in any related regulations, the state 30 [ombudsman] ombudsperson, in coordination with the state office for the 31 aging, may refuse, suspend, or remove the designation of the local 32 [ombudsmen] ombudsperson entity. Prior to taking such action, the state 33 [ombudsman] ombudsperson shall send to the affected local program a 34 notice of the state [ombudsman's] ombudsperson's intentions to refuse, 35 suspend, or remove the designation; provided, however, if the state 36 office for the aging is aware or becomes aware of evidence that the 37 designation or continued designation of an entity to operate a long-term 38 care [ombudsman] ombudsperson program would result in legal concerns or 39 liability for the state office for the aging or the office of the state 40 long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson, the state [ombudsman] ombud- 41 sperson will comply with the state office for the aging's determination 42 that such designation should not be made or that such designation be 43 refused, suspended, or removed. 44 (e) The state [ombudsman] ombudsperson shall develop a grievance proc- 45 ess to offer an opportunity for reconsideration of any decision to 46 refuse, suspend, or remove the designation of a local [ombudsman] ombud- 47 sperson entity. Notwithstanding the grievance process, the state 48 [ombudsman] ombudsperson shall make the final determination to designate 49 or to refuse, suspend, or remove the designation of a local [ombudsman] 50 ombudsperson entity; provided, however, if the state office for the 51 aging is aware or becomes aware of any evidence that the designation of 52 an entity to operate a long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson program 53 by the state long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson or that the failure 54 of the state [ombudsman] ombudsperson to refuse, suspend, or remove the 55 designation of a local [ombudsman] ombudsperson entity would result in 56 legal concerns or liability for the state office for the aging or the A. 5006--A 4 1 office of the state long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson, the state 2 [ombudsman] ombudsperson will comply with the state office for the 3 aging's determination that such designation should not be made or that 4 such designation be refused, suspended, or removed. 5 (f) Each district shall receive the sum of eighty-six thousand two 6 hundred dollars annually for the purposes of administrating the district 7 long-term care ombudsperson council program. 8 § 4. Subdivision 14 of section 218 of the elder law, as amended by 9 chapter 776 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 10 14. Annual report. (a) On or before March thirty-first, two thousand 11 five, and annually thereafter, the state [ombudsman] ombudsperson shall 12 submit to the governor, commissioner of the federal administration on 13 aging, speaker of the assembly, temporary president of the senate, 14 director of the state office for the aging, commissioner of the depart- 15 ment of health, and the commissioner of children and family services a 16 report and make such report available to the public: 17 [(a)] (i) describing the activities carried out by the office of the 18 state long-term care [ombudsman] ombudsperson during the prior calendar 19 year; 20 [(b)] (ii) containing and analyzing data relating to complaints and 21 conditions in long-term care facilities and to residents for the purpose 22 of identifying and resolving significant problems, including an examina- 23 tion of any recurring complaints to determine if there are systemic 24 issues in such facilities; 25 [(c)] (iii) evaluating the problems experienced by, and the complaints 26 made by or on behalf of, residents; 27 [(d)] (iv) containing recommendations for appropriate state legis- 28 lation, rules and regulations and other action based on data collected 29 pursuant to this section, concerns raised by residents and families of 30 residents, and observations made when visiting long-term care facili- 31 ties, to improve the quality of the care and life of the residents, 32 protecting the health, safety and welfare and rights of the residents 33 and resolving resident complaints and identified problems or barriers; 34 [(e)] (v) containing an analysis of the success of the long-term care 35 [ombudsman] ombudsperson program, including success in providing 36 services to residents; 37 [(f)] (vi) describing barriers that prevent the optimal operation of 38 the [ombudsman] ombudsperson program; 39 [(g)] (vii) describing any organizational conflicts of interest in the 40 ombudsman program that have been identified and the steps taken to 41 remove or remedy such conflicts; 42 [(h)] (viii) containing all complaints received by the state [ombuds- 43 man] ombudsperson relating to long-term care facilities including but 44 not limited to complaints that suggest the possible occurrence of phys- 45 ical abuse, mistreatment, neglect or Medicaid fraud, listed by type of 46 complaint, facility name and by region; 47 [(i)] (ix) containing the number of visits to each long-term care 48 facility, listed by facility name and by region, and names of long-term 49 care facilities that did not receive any visits in the prior year; and 50 [(j)] (x) any other matters as the state [ombudsman] ombudsperson, in 51 consultation with the director of the state office for the aging, deter- 52 mines to be appropriate. 53 (b) On or before March thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, and 54 annually thereafter, each district long-term care ombudsperson council 55 program shall submit to the attorney general a report and make such 56 report available to the public: A. 5006--A 5 1 (i) describing the activities carried out by the district council 2 program during the prior calendar year; 3 (ii) containing and analyzing data relating to complaints and condi- 4 tions in long-term care facilities and to residents for the purpose of 5 identifying and resolving significant problems; 6 (iii) evaluating the problems experienced by, and the complaints made 7 by or on behalf of, residents; 8 (iv) containing recommendations for appropriate state legislation, 9 rules and regulations and other action to improve the quality of the 10 care and life of the residents, protecting the health, safety and 11 welfare and rights of the residents and resolving resident complaints 12 and identified problems or barriers; 13 (v) containing an analysis of the success of the district council 14 program, including success in providing services to residents; 15 (vi) describing barriers that prevent the optimal operation of the 16 district council program; 17 (vii) describing any organizational conflicts of interest in the 18 district council program that have been identified and the steps taken 19 to remove or remedy such conflicts; 20 (viii) any other matters as the district council determines to be 21 appropriate; and 22 (ix) in the cases of new nursing homes that are opening in a partic- 23 ular district under a different name or with ownership from a previous 24 facility that was closed or cited for issues by the department of 25 health, provide recommendations for the nursing home to be approved for 26 opening. 27 § 5. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 28 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 29 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 30 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 31 completed on or before such effective date.